Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.92, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. All-terrain vehicle or vehicle. (a) "All-terrain vehicle" or "vehicle" means a motorized vehicle with: (1) not less than three, but not more than six deleted text begin low pressure or non-pneumaticdeleted text end tires; (2) a total dry weight of deleted text begin 2,000deleted text end new text begin 3,000 new text end pounds or less; and (3) a total width from outside of tire rim to outside of tire rim that is 65 inches or less. All-terrain vehicle includes a class 1 all-terrain vehicle and class 2 all-terrain vehicle. (b) All-terrain vehicle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27, golf cart, mini-truck, dune buggy, or go-cart or a vehicle designed and used specifically for lawn maintenance, agriculture, logging, or mining purposes.